Hawaii statutes.
[F.] School
Health Services Program

Revision Note

Sections 302A-851 to 855, enacted as a new part, are
redesignated as a subpart pursuant to §23G-15.

Cross References

Career development opportunities, see §302A-708.

Medically accurate sexuality health education, see §321-11.1.

[§302A-851] Purpose; establishment of
program. The purpose of this [subpart] is to establish a statewide school
health services program. There shall be within the department a permanent
comprehensive school health services program for grades kindergarten through
twelve in all the public schools of this State. It is in the general welfare
of the State to protect, preserve, care for, and improve the physical and
mental health of Hawaii's children by making available at the public schools
first aid and emergency care, preventive health care, health appraisals and
follow-ups, and health room facilities. [L 2007, c 105, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next